Rhode Island, session 2025, SB422.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. As previously authorized by a vote of the electors of the town at the financial
town meeting held on May 2, 2022 and Rhode Island General Laws § 45-12-2, the Town of New
Shoreham was empowered to issue bonds to an amount not exceeding ten million four hundred
thousand dollars ($10,400,000), from time to time to finance additions, renovations, improvements,
alterations and repairs to schools and school facilities in the Town.
SECTION 2. In accordance with section 16-7-44 of the general laws, the principal and
interest on such bonds shall be eligible for state housing aid reimbursement.
SECTION 3. This act serves as the enabling act required by Rhode Island General Laws §
16-7-44 and shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000978
========